Tennessee, session 114, HB0635.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-4-2006, is amended by adding
the following language as a new subsection:
( ) The department of revenue is urged to study the economic impact of
adjustments to net earnings and net losses authorized by this section. If such study is
conducted, on or before January 1, 2026, then the department shall report its findings
and recommendations to the finance, ways and means committee of the senate and the
committee in the house of representatives having jurisdiction over tax-related matters.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0635
001709
- 1 -